Louisiana, session 2026, HB564.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:23, 24, and 25 are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
14:24.1 and 24.2 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§23. Parties classified
The parties to crimes are classified as any of the following:
(1) Principals; and Principal.
(2) Accessory before the fact.
(3) Accessories Accessory after the fact.
§24. Principals Principal
All persons concerned in the commission of a crime, whether who are present
or absent, and whether they directly commit the act constituting the offense, aid and
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-897 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 564
abet in its commission, or directly or indirectly counsel or procure another to commit
the crime, are principals. The bill of information or indictment shall read principal.
§24.1. Accessory before the fact
An accessory before the fact is any person concerned in the commission of
a crime, whether present or absent, and who aids and abets the principal in his
commission, or who directly or indirectly counsels or procures the principal to
commit the crime. The bill of information or indictment shall read accessory before
the fact.
§24.2. Accessory before the fact; penalties
An accessory before the fact shall be punished as follows:
(1) If the offense is punishable by life imprisonment, the accessory before
the fact shall be imprisoned at hard labor for not less than five years nor more than
fifteen years.
(2)(a) If the offense is theft or receiving stolen things, and is not punishable
as a felony, the accessory before the fact shall be fined not more than one hundred
dollars, imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.
(b) If the offense is receiving stolen things, and is punishable as a felony, the
accessory before the fact shall be fined not more than two hundred dollars,
imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.
(c) If the offense is theft of an amount not less than five hundred dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars, the accessory before the fact shall be fined not more
than five hundred dollars, imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.
(d) If the offense is theft of an amount over five thousand dollars, the
accessory before the fact shall be fined not more than two thousand five hundred
dollars, imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than five years, or both.
(3) In all other cases, the accessory before the fact shall be fined, imprisoned,
or both, in the same manner as the principal of the offense, except that such fine and
term of imprisonment for the accessory before the fact shall not exceed one-half of
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-897 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 564
the maximum fine prescribed for the offense nor shall it exceed one-half of the
maximum term of imprisonment prescribed for the offense.
§25. Accessories Accessory after the fact
A. An accessory after the fact is any person who, after the commission of a
felony, shall harbor, conceal, or aid the offender, knowing or having reasonable
ground to believe that he has committed the felony, and with the intent that he may
avoid or escape from arrest, trial, conviction, or punishment.
B. An accessory after the fact may not be tried and punished,
notwithstanding the fact that until the principal felon may not have been arrested,
tried, has been convicted, or amenable to justice.
C. Whoever becomes an accessory after the fact shall be fined not more than
five hundred dollars, or imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for not more than
five years, or both; provided that in no case shall his the punishment be greater than
one-half of the maximum provided by law for a principal offender.
* * *
Section 2. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 881.1(A)(1) and (2) are hereby
amended and reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure Article 881.1(A)(5) is hereby
enacted to read as follows:
Art. 881.1. Motion to reconsider sentence
A.(1) In Except as provided in Subparagraph (5) of this Paragraph, in felony
cases, within thirty days following the imposition of sentence or within such longer
period as the trial court may set at sentence, the state or the defendant may make or
file a motion to reconsider sentence.
(2) In Except as provided in Subparagraph (5) of this Paragraph, in
misdemeanor cases, the defendant may file a motion to reconsider sentence at any
time following commencement or execution of such sentence. The court may grant
the motion and amend the sentence, even following completion of execution of the
sentence, to impose a lesser sentence which could lawfully have been imposed.
* * *
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-897 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 564
(5)(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if the defendant
is incarcerated after having been convicted as a principal in the commission of a
crime as defined by R.S. 14:24, but was actually an accessory before the fact in the
commission of a crime as defined by R.S. 14:24.1, the defendant may file a motion
to reconsider the sentence if he has served at least one-third of the sentence imposed
upon conviction as a principal in the commission of the crime.
(b) The motion to reconsider the sentence shall set forth the evidence
supporting the claim that the defendant was an accessory before the fact in the
commission of the crime as defined by R.S. 14:24.1 and not a principal in the
commission of the crime as defined by R.S. 14:24. If, based upon facts previously
presented at trial or upon facts proffered by the defendant in support of the motion
pursuant to Paragraph D of this Article, the court determines by a preponderance of
evidence that the defendant was an accessory before the fact in the commission of
the offense, the court shall grant the motion and amend the sentence of the defendant
in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 14:24.2, with credit for time served by the
offender for the sentence imposed upon him as a principal in the commission of the
offense.
* * *